Indiana, session 2026, HB1093.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-33-8-0.2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.285-2013,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 0.2. (a) As used in this chapter, "bullying" means
overt, unwanted repeated acts or gestures, including verbal or written
communications or images transmitted in any manner (including
digitally or electronically), physical acts committed, aggression, or any
other behaviors, that are committed by a school staff member, a
student, or a group of students against another student with the intent
to harass, ridicule, humiliate, intimidate, or harm the targeted student
and create for the targeted student an objectively hostile school
environment that:
(1) places the targeted student in reasonable fear of harm to the
targeted student's person or property;
(2) has a substantially detrimental effect on the targeted student's
physical or mental health;
(3) has the effect of substantially interfering with the targeted
student's academic performance; or
2026 IN 1093—LS 6504/DI 152


(4) has the effect of substantially interfering with the targeted
student's ability to participate in or benefit from the services,
activities, and privileges provided by the school.
(b) The term may not be interpreted to impose any burden or
sanction on, or include in the definition of the term, the following:
(1) Participating in a religious event.
(2) Acting in an emergency involving the protection of a person
or property from an imminent threat of serious bodily injury or
substantial danger.
(3) Participating in an activity consisting of the exercise of a
student's rights protected under the First Amendment to the
United States Constitution or Article I, Section 31 of the
Constitution of the State of Indiana, or both.
(4) Participating in an activity conducted by a nonprofit or
governmental entity that provides recreation, education, training,
or other care under the supervision of one (1) or more adults.
(5) Participating in an activity undertaken at the prior written
direction of the student's parent.
(6) Engaging in interstate or international travel from a location
outside Indiana to another location outside Indiana.
SECTION 2. IC 20-33-8-36 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 36. (a) Each public school, including a charter school,
shall:
(1) track the acts of bullying and abusive behaviors against a
victim;
(2) monitor supports for the victim;
(3) track the acts of an alleged perpetrator who is exhibiting
bullying or abusive behaviors, including written, verbal,
physical, and sexual forms of abusive behavior and
cyberbullying (as defined in IC 20-19-3-11.5(a)); and
(4) analyze the information collected under subdivisions (1)
and (3) to help determine an appropriate intervention plan
that must be provided to another public school if the alleged
perpetrator transfers to the other public school.
(b) A parent of a student or a student, if the student is an
emancipated minor, may submit a grievance to the public school or
charter school that the student attends for a violation of subsection
(a).
(c) Each public school, including a charter school, shall establish
and maintain a procedure for the resolution of a grievance under
this section.
2026 IN 1093—LS 6504/DI 152


SECTION 3. IC 20-34-6-3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Each school corporation and charter school
shall, for each school year, do the following:
(1) Document and track all acts of bullying (as defined in
20-33-8-0.2) and abusive behaviors regarding:
(A) a victim of bullying; and
(B) an alleged perpetrator exhibiting bullying or abusive
behaviors, including written, verbal, physical, and sexual
forms of abusive behavior and cyberbullying (as defined in
IC 20-19-3-11.5(a)).
(2) Use the documentation and tracking described in
subdivision (1) to identify:
(A) the frequency and type of bullying or abusive
behaviors within the school corporation or charter school;
and
(B) students who may be at high risk of being a victim or
alleged perpetrator of bullying or abusive behavior.
(3) Prepare and implement targeted interventions to deter
and prevent bullying and abusive behaviors with regard to
victims or alleged perpetrators.
(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, and not later than July 1 of each
year thereafter, each school corporation and charter school shall
do the following:
(1) Compile and prepare a report that summarizes the
information under subsection (a), including the prepared and
implemented interventions described in subsection (a)(3). The
report must provide summaries for each school corporation
and charter school, but may not contain any personal,
identifiable information of any individual.
(2) Submit the report described in subdivision (1) to the
following:
(A) The department.
(B) The state board.
(C) The legislative council in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
(c) On or before August 1, 2027, and not later than August 1 of
each year thereafter, the state board shall:
(1) review the report described in subsection (b);
(2) identify school corporations or charter schools with the
most frequent acts of bullying or abusive behaviors; and
(3) provide tailored recommendations to each school
2026 IN 1093—LS 6504/DI 152


corporation or charter school identified under subdivision (2)
to reduce the frequency of acts of bullying or abusive
behaviors.
SECTION 4. IC 31-33-18-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.54-2024,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. Except as otherwise prohibited by federal law,
the reports and other material described in section 1(a) of this chapter
and the unredacted reports and other material described in section 1(b)
of this chapter shall be made available only to the following:
(1) Persons authorized by this article.
(2) A legally mandated public or private child protective agency
investigating a report of child abuse or neglect or treating a child
or family that is the subject of a report or record.
(3) Any of the following who are investigating a report of a child
who may be a victim of child abuse or neglect:
(A) A police officer or other law enforcement agency.
(B) A prosecuting attorney.
(C) A coroner, in the case of the death of a child.
(4) A physician who has before the physician a child whom the
physician reasonably suspects may be a victim of child abuse or
neglect.
(5) An individual legally authorized to place a child in protective
custody if:
(A) the individual has before the individual a child whom the
individual reasonably suspects may be a victim of abuse or
neglect; and
(B) the individual requires the information in the report or
record to determine whether to place the child in protective
custody.
(6) An agency having the legal responsibility or authorization to
care for, treat, or supervise a child who is the subject of a report
or record or a parent, guardian, custodian, or other person who is
responsible for the child's welfare.
(7) An individual named in the report or record who is alleged to
be abused or neglected or, if the individual named in the report is
a child or is otherwise incompetent, the individual's guardian ad
litem or the individual's court appointed special advocate, or both.
(8) Each parent, guardian, custodian, or other person responsible
for the welfare of a child named in a report or record and an
attorney of the person described under this subdivision, with
protection for the identity of reporters and other appropriate
individuals.
2026 IN 1093—LS 6504/DI 152


(9) A court, for redaction of the record in accordance with section
1.5 of this chapter, or upon the court's finding that access to the
records may be necessary for determination of an issue before the
court. However, except for disclosure of a redacted record in
accordance with section 1.5 of this chapter, access is limited to in
camera inspection unless the court determines that public
disclosure of the information contained in the records is necessary
for the resolution of an issue then pending before the court.
(10) A grand jury upon the grand jury's determination that access
to the records is necessary in the conduct of the grand jury's
official business.
(11) An appropriate state or local official responsible for child
protection services or legislation carrying out the official's official
functions.
(12) The community child protection team appointed under
IC 31-33-3 (or IC 31-6-11-14 before its repeal), upon request, to
enable the team to carry out the team's purpose under IC 31-33-3.
(13) A person about whom a report has been made, with
protection for the identity of:
(A) any person reporting known or suspected child abuse or
neglect; and
(B) any other person if the person or agency making the
information available finds that disclosure of the information
would be likely to endanger the life or safety of the person.
(14) An employee of the department, a caseworker, or a juvenile
probation officer conducting a criminal history check under
IC 31-26-5, IC 31-34, or IC 31-37 to determine the
appropriateness of an out-of-home placement for a:
(A) child at imminent risk of placement;
(B) child in need of services; or
(C) delinquent child.
The results of a criminal history check conducted under this
subdivision must be disclosed to a court determining the
placement of a child described in clauses (A) through (C).
(15) A local child fatality review team established under
IC 16-49-2.
(16) The statewide child fatality review committee established by
IC 16-49-4.
(17) The department.
(18) The division of family resources, if the investigation report:
(A) is classified as substantiated; and
(B) concerns:
2026 IN 1093—LS 6504/DI 152


(i) an applicant for a license to operate;
(ii) a person licensed to operate;
(iii) an employee of; or
(iv) a volunteer providing services at;
a child care center licensed under IC 12-17.2-4 or a child care
home licensed under IC 12-17.2-5.
(19) A citizen review panel established under IC 31-25-2-20.4.
(20) The department of child services ombudsman established by
IC 4-13-19-3.
(21) The secretary of education with protection for the identity of:
(A) any person reporting known or suspected child abuse or
neglect; and
(B) any other person if the person or agency making the
information available finds that disclosure of the information
would be likely to endanger the life or safety of the person.
(22) The state child fatality review coordinator employed by the
Indiana department of health under IC 16-49-5-1.
(23) A person who operates a child caring institution, group
home, or secure private facility if all the following apply:
(A) The child caring institution, group home, or secure private
facility is licensed under IC 31-27.
(B) The report or other materials concern:
(i) an employee of;
(ii) a volunteer providing services at; or
(iii) a child placed at;
the child caring institution, group home, or secure private
facility.
(C) The allegation in the report occurred at the child caring
institution, group home, or secure private facility.
(24) A person who operates a child placing agency if all the
following apply:
(A) The child placing agency is licensed under IC 31-27.
(B) The report or other materials concern:
(i) a child placed in a foster home licensed by the child
placing agency;
(ii) a person licensed by the child placing agency to operate
a foster family home;
(iii) an employee of the child placing agency or a foster
family home licensed by the child placing agency; or
(iv) a volunteer providing services at the child placing
agency or a foster family home licensed by the child placing
agency.
2026 IN 1093—LS 6504/DI 152


(C) The allegations in the report occurred in the foster family
home or in the course of employment or volunteering at the
child placing agency or foster family home.
(25) The National Center for Missing and Exploited Children.
(26) A local domestic violence fatality review team established
under IC 12-18-8, as determined by the department to be relevant
to the death or near fatality that the local domestic violence
fatality review team is reviewing.
(27) The statewide domestic violence fatality review committee
established under IC 12-18-9-3, as determined by the department
to be relevant to the death or near fatality that the statewide
domestic violence fatality review committee is reviewing.
(28) The statewide maternal mortality review committee
established under IC 16-50-1-3, as determined by the department
to be relevant to the case of maternal morbidity or maternal
mortality that the statewide maternal mortality review committee
is reviewing.
(29) A local fetal-infant mortality review team established under
IC 16-49-6, as determined by the department to be relevant to the
case of fetal or infant fatality that the local fetal-infant mortality
review team is reviewing.
(30) A suicide and overdose fatality review team established
under IC 16-49.5-2, as determined by the department to be
relevant to the case of a suicide or overdose fatality that the
suicide and overdose fatality review team is reviewing.
(31) The office of administrative law proceedings for a matter that
is the subject of an administrative proceeding before the office of
administrative law proceedings.
(32) A tribal representative, agency, or organization authorized by
the Indian child's tribe to care for, diagnose, treat, review,
evaluate, or monitor active efforts regarding an Indian child, and
the Indian child's parent, guardian, or custodian.
(33) The United States Department of State and foreign
governments to comply with federal law and treaties.
(34) A child advocacy center when the child advocacy center has
before it an investigation of child abuse or neglect in which it is
facilitating a forensic interview or facilitating a case discussion or
case review.
(35) A liaison designated by a school if the:
(A) school's personnel reported the alleged abuse or
neglect; and
(B) child is at risk of:
2026 IN 1093—LS 6504/DI 152


(i) harming themself;
(ii) harming a peer; or
(iii) being harmed by a peer;
while the child is attending the school.
2026 IN 1093—LS 6504/DI 152